Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,191
Act, how cited.

Sections 81-15,191 to 81-15,235 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Emergency Planning and Community Right to Know Act.

Laws 1997, LB 374, § 1.